Utah statutes.
57-16-7.5.    Payment of rent required after notice -- Summary judgment.
(1) (a)  Any resident shall continue to pay the mobile home park all rent
required by the lease after having been served with any notice pursuant to
this chapter, except a notice for nonpayment of rent.
(b)  In cases not involving payment of rent, the mobile home park may accept
rent without waiving any rights under this chapter.
(2)  If the resident fails to pay rent, the mobile home park shall be entitled
to summary judgment for:
(a)  the rent owed;
(b)  termination of the lease; and
(c)  restitution of the premises.
(3)  The summary judgment as provided in Subsection (2) shall be granted even
if a five-day notice to pay or quit was not served, so long as another
appropriate notice under this chapter has been served.
